Washington statutes.
RCW 36.22.240

Surcharge for growth management planning and review—Increasing residential building capacity.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a surcharge of two dollars and fifty cents shall be charged by the county auditor for each document recorded, which will be in addition to any other charge or surcharge allowed by law. The auditor shall remit the funds to the state treasurer to be deposited and used as follows:

(a) Through June 30, 2024, funds must be deposited into the growth management planning and environmental review fund created in RCW 36.70A.490 to be used first for grants for costs associated with RCW 36.70A.600 and for costs associated with RCW 36.70A.610, and thereafter for any allowable use of the fund.

(b) Beginning July 1, 2024, sufficient funds must be deposited into the growth management planning and environmental review fund created in RCW 36.70A.490 for costs associated with RCW 36.70A.610, and the remainder deposited into the home security fund account created in RCW 43.185C.060 to be used for maintenance and operation costs of: (i) Permanent supportive housing and (ii) affordable housing for very low-income and extremely low-income households. Funds may only be expended in cities that have taken action under RCW 36.70A.600.

(2) The surcharge imposed in this section does not apply to: (a) Assignments or substitutions of previously recorded deeds of trust; (b) documents recording a birth, marriage, divorce, or death; (c) any recorded documents otherwise exempted from a recording fee or additional surcharges under state law; (d) marriage licenses issued by the county auditor; or (e) documents recording a federal, state, county, city, or water-sewer district, or wage lien or satisfaction of lien.

(3) For purposes of this section, the terms "permanent supportive housing," "affordable housing," "very low-income households," and "extremely low-income households" have the same meaning as provided in RCW 36.70A.030.

[ 2021 c 214 s 10; 2019 c 348 s 11.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Department of commerce and William D. Ruckelshaus center examination of homelessness—Reports—2021 c 214: See note following RCW 43.185C.185.

Effective date—2019 c 348 s 11: "Section 11 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2019." [ 2019 c 348 s 12.]